California, session 20252026, AB1736.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 86205 of the Government Code is amended to read:86205. (a) A lobbyist or lobbying firm shall not:(1) Do anything with the purpose of placing any elected state officer, legislative official, agency official, or state candidate under personal obligation to the lobbyist, the lobbying firm, or the lobbyist’s or the firm’s employer.(2) Deceive or attempt to deceive any elected state officer, legislative official, agency official, or state candidate with regard to any material fact pertinent to any pending or proposed legislative or administrative action.(3) Cause or influence the introduction of any bill or amendment thereto for the purpose of thereafter being employed to secure its passage or defeat.(4) Represent falsely, either directly or indirectly, that the lobbyist or the lobbying firm can control the official action of any elected state officer, legislative official, or agency official.(5) Accept or agree to accept any payment in any way contingent upon the defeat, enactment, or outcome of any proposed legislative or administrative action.(b) A lobbyist, lobbying firm, or lobbying employer shall not create or attempt to create a fictitious appearance of public favor or disfavor of any proposed legislative or administrative action or cause or attempt to cause any communication to be sent to any elected state officer, legislative official, agency official, or state candidate in the name of any fictitious person or in the name of any real person, except with the consent of such real person.SEC. 2. Section 86206 of the Government Code is amended to read:86206. This article does not prohibit the payment of fees for contractual services provided to an investment manager by a placement agent, as defined in Section 82047.3, who is registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission and regulated by the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority, except as provided in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 86205.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SEC. 4. The Legislature finds and declares that this bill furthers the purposes of the Political Reform Act of 1974 within the meaning of subdivision (a) of Section 81012 of the Government Code.